South Dakota, session 2026, HB1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-9-23 be AMENDED:
11-9-23. If Except as provided in this section, if the municipality adopts an
amendment to the original project plan for any district that includes additional project
costs for which tax increments may be received by the municipality, the tax increment
base for the district shall must be redetermined pursuant to § 11-9-20. The tax increment
base as redetermined under this section is effective for the purposes of this chapter only
if it exceeds the original tax increment base determined pursuant to § 11-9-20.
The provisions of this section do not apply if the additional project costs are thirty-
five fifteen percent or less than the amount approved in the original project plan and the
additional project costs will are to be incurred before the expiration of the period specified
in § 11-9-13.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.